Colorado statutes. TITLE 30 Government - County
PART 3 COUNTY COMMISSIONERS
30-10-306.7. Procedure for electing county commissioners.

In any county having a population of seventy thousand or more which has increased the membership of the board of county commissioners to five pursuant to sections 1-4-205 (3)(a), C.R.S., and 30-10-306.5, the registered electors may, either by referendum or by initiative, change the method of electing said members or reduce the membership of the board of county commissioners to three, pursuant to the procedures in this section.

In any such county, the method of electing members of the board of county commissioners may be changed to any one of the following methods:

Five commissioners resident in five districts, elected by the voters of the whole county or elected only by voters resident in the district from which the member runs for election. In such case, the procedures for election shall be in accordance with section 30-10-306.5 (6). The county clerk and recorder shall make any other necessary provision to effectuate the change in method of election.

Three commissioners resident in three districts, elected by the voters of the whole county or elected only by voters resident in the district from which the member runs for election. In such case, the procedures for election shall be in accordance with subsection (5) of this section.

Five commissioners elected as follows: Three commissioners resident in three districts and elected by voters resident in those districts and two commissioners elected at large; or three commissioners resident in districts and elected by voters of the whole county and two commissioners elected at large. In such case, the procedures for election shall be in accordance with paragraph (a) of subsection (5) of this section.

The registered electors of such a county may, either by referendum or by initiative, decrease the members of the board of county commissioners from five to three. In such case, the term of office of all members serving on the board shall expire at the time the next duly elected board takes the oath of office following the first general election after the voters' approval of such decrease, and three new members shall be elected in accordance with sections 1-4-205 (2), C.R.S., and 30-10-306. Two seats, as determined by lot, shall be elected for four-year terms and the remaining seat shall be elected for a two-year term of office in accordance with sections 1-4-205 (2), C.R.S., and 30-10-306. The county clerk and recorder shall make any necessary changes to effectuate the decrease in membership.

Subject to referral as provided in this subsection (3), a board of county commissioners may pass a resolution decreasing the membership of the board, as provided in subsection (2) of this section. Prior to the ninetieth day before the next general election, the board of county commissioners shall request that the county clerk and recorder place the resolution on the ballot for referral to the registered electors of the county at the next general election.

Subject to referral as provided in this subsection (3), a board of county commissioners may pass a resolution changing the method of electing the members of the board. The resolution shall be referred to the registered electors of the county at a general election. If any number of the county commissioners are not elected by the voters of the whole county when the board of county commissioners passes this resolution, then the resolution must designate no fewer than two of the methods of election set forth in subsection (2) of this section. If a majority of votes cast are in favor of the resolution, the board of county commissioners shall take such action as is necessary to ensure that the county commissioners are elected at the next general election according to the procedure for election contained in the resolution that received the largest number of votes cast.

In the alternative, a petition signed by at least eight percent of the total number of qualified electors of a county voting for all candidates for the office of secretary of state at the last preceding general election shall be sufficient to place on the ballot at a general election the question of whether to change the method of electing members of the board or to decrease the membership of the board. In the case of a petition to change the method of electing members of the board, such petition shall specify the method of election according to subsection (2) of this section. Such a petition, shall be delivered to the county clerk and recorder prior to the ninetieth day before the next general election with a request that the question be placed on the ballot for referral to the registered electors of the county at the next general election.

If a majority of the votes cast on the question are in favor of changing the method of electing the five commissioners or providing for three commissioners, as provided in subsection (2)(a)(II) or (2)(a)(III) of this section, the board of county commissioners shall change the boundaries of the commissioner districts so as to create three districts as nearly equal in population as possible based on the most recent federal census of the United States minus the number of persons serving a sentence of detention or confinement in any correctional facility in the county as indicated in the statistical report of the department of corrections for the most recent fiscal year. The districts must be numbered consecutively and are not subject to alteration more often than once every two years; except that, notwithstanding section 30-10-306 (3), the board may alter the districts to conform to precinct boundaries that are changed in accordance with section 1-5-103 (1), based on the division of the state into congressional districts or an approved plan for redistricting of the members of the general assembly when necessary to ensure that no precinct is located in more than one district. All other provisions of sections 1-4-205 (3)(a) and 30-10-306 (2) and (3) relating to the method of electing members, as provided in this subsection (5)(a), are applicable; except that, when districts are created, such changes must be completed by July 1 of the odd-numbered year immediately preceding the general election.

Upon adoption of the boundaries of the three commissioner districts pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, it shall be decided by lot which of the five presently elected commissioners shall serve each of the three commissioner districts and which two commissioners shall serve the county at large.

If more than one presently elected commissioner resides within the boundaries of the same newly created commissioner district, those commissioners shall first determine by lot which of them will serve that district and which of them will represent the county at large. The remaining commissioners shall then determine by lot which of them will serve the two remaining districts and which of them will serve as the second commissioner at large.

The county clerk and recorder shall establish the time, place, and manner in which such lots shall be conducted and shall declare the official results of such lots immediately thereafter.

In the event that the registered electors of a county vote to change the method of election pursuant to this subsection (5), the terms of office of the five presently elected commissioners shall not be affected.

Thereafter, the method of election in such counties shall be as provided in sections 1-4-205 (3)(a), C.R.S., and 30-10-306.5 (5).

Signature requirements governing petitions for a race involving a seat on the board of county commissioners for the next four calendar years immediately following an election at which the voters have approved a decrease in the number of county commissioners from five to three under this section are specified in section 1-4-801 (2)(e), C.R.S., for major political party candidates, and section 1-4-802 (2), C.R.S., for candidates who do not wish to affiliate with a major political party. Following the first four calendar years after such a change in the membership of the board of county commissioners has been approved by the voters, the signature requirements for a petition for a county commissioner candidate must follow the procedures specified in section 1-4-801 (2)(a), C.R.S., for major political party candidates, and section 1-4-802 (1)(c)(VI), C.R.S., for candidates who do not wish to affiliate with a major political party, as applicable.

.

Source:

L. 88:

Entire section added, p. 1111, § 1, effective April 9; (5)(a) amended, p. 1436, § 36, effective June 11.

L. 2002:

(5)(a) amended, p. 136, § 2, effective August 7.

L. 2013:

(6) added, (SB 13-243), ch. 268, p. 1413, § 4, effective May 24.

L. 2020:

(5)(a) amended, (SB 20-186), ch. 272, p. 1330, § 18, effective July 11.

L. 2021:

(3) amended, (HB 21-1047), ch. 70, p. 287, § 4, effective April 29.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 21-1047, see section 1 of chapter 70, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.

30-10-307. Chairman - temporary chairman.

At the first meeting after election, the board of county commissioners shall choose one of its number as chairman, who shall preside at such meeting and all other meetings, if present; but, in case of his absence from such meeting, the members present shall choose one of its number as temporary chairman.

Source:

G.L.

§ 460.

G.S.

§ 543.

R.S. 08:

§ 1199.

C.L.

§ 8675.

CSA:

C. 45, § 18.

CRS 53:

§ 35-3-7.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 35-3-7.

30-10-308. Oaths administered and orders signed by chairman.

The chairman of said board of county commissioners has the power to administer oaths to any person concerning any matter submitted to the board or connected with its powers and duties, and he shall sign all county orders.

Source:

G.L.

§ 461.

G.S.

§ 544.

R.S. 08:

§ 1201.

C.L.

§ 8678.

CSA:

C. 45, § 21.

CRS 53:

§ 35-3-8.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 35-3-8.

30-10-309. County commissioner vacancies. (Repealed)

Source:

G.L.

§§ 445, 473, 942.

G.S.

§§ 537, 552, 1166.

R.S. 08:

§§ 1202, 1239, 2334.

C.L.

§§ 7822, 8679, 8680.

CSA:

C. 45, §§ 22, 23.

CSA:

C. 59, § 311.

CRS 53:

§ 35-3-9.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 35-3-9.

L. 79:

Entire section R&RE, p. 1142, § 1, effective March 13.

L. 80:

Entire section repealed, p. 418, § 38, effective January 1, 1981.

30-10-310. Committee of commissioners - report.

If the board of county commissioners sees fit to refer any matter to a committee of its members, the actions of said committee shall not be final, but shall be reported to the board for its consideration, and the board's action thereon shall be placed in its records.

Source:

L. 1891:

p. 114, § 1.

R.S. 08:

§ 1203.

C.L.

§ 8681.

CSA:

C. 45, § 24.

CRS 53:

§ 35-3-10.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 35-3-10.

30-10-311. Bonds or insurance of county commissioners.

Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, each county commissioner of the several counties of this state is required to execute a bond, payable to the people of the state of Colorado, conditioned that the commissioner will faithfully and honestly discharge the duties of the office of county commissioner so long as the commissioner continues in office, and that the commissioner will not, either directly or indirectly, misappropriate, or permit to be misappropriated, any of the funds or property of said county while in office; that the commissioner will not, while in office, be interested or concerned in any manner, directly or indirectly, in any sale, purchase, bargain, or contract whereby any sum of money or thing in action becomes due to such commissioner from such county, or from any person from such county; and that the commissioner will at all times transact the business of such county economically, and to the best of the commissioner's ability, for the best interest of such county.

In lieu of the bond required by subsection (1) of this section, a county may purchase crime insurance coverage on behalf of the county commissioner to protect the people of the county from any malfeasance on the part of the commissioner while in office.

Source:

L. 1881:

p. 96, § 1.

G.S.

§ 564.

R.S. 08:

§ 1244.

C.L.

§ 8720.

CSA:

C. 45, § 67.

CRS 53:

§ 35-3-11.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 35-3-11.

L. 2010:

Entire section amended, (HB 10-1062), ch. 161, p. 557, § 5, effective August 11.

30-10-312. Amount of bond or insurance - county commissioners.

The bond executed by the county commissioners in counties with a population of ten thousand or more persons pursuant to section 30-10-311 (1) or the insurance purchased by the county on behalf of the county commissioners pursuant to section 30-10-311 (2) shall be in the sum of ten thousand dollars and in counties with a population under ten thousand persons shall be in the sum of five thousand dollars.

Source:

L. 1881:

p. 97, § 2.

G.S.

§ 565.

R.S. 08:

§ 1245.

C.L.

§ 8721.

CSA:

C. 45, § 68.

CRS 53:

§ 35-3-12.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 35-3-12.

L. 73:

p. 1401, § 25.

L. 2010:

Entire section amended, (HB 10-1062), ch. 161, p. 558, § 6, effective August 11.

30-10-313. Bond executed or insurance purchased before duties assumed.

No county commissioner shall enter upon the duties of the office of commissioner unless the commissioner has executed the bond described in section 30-10-311 (1) or the county has purchased the insurance described in section 30-10-311 (2).

Source:

L. 1881:

p. 97, § 3.

G.S.

§ 566.

R.S. 08:

§ 1246.

C.L.

§ 8722.

CSA:

C. 45, § 69.

CRS 53:

§ 35-3-13.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 35-3-13.

L. 2010:

Entire section amended, (HB 10-1062), ch. 161, p. 558, § 7, effective August 11.

30-10-314. Where bond filed.

If a county commissioner executes a bond pursuant to section 30-10-311 (1), the bond, after approval by the judge of the district court, shall be filed by the county clerk and recorder of such county and shall be recorded in the records of the county.

Source:

L. 1881:

p. 98, § 6.

G.S.

§ 569.

R.S. 08:

§ 1248.

C.L.

§ 8724.

CSA:

C. 45, § 71.

CRS 53:

§ 35-3-15.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 35-3-15.

L. 2010:

Entire section amended, (HB 10-1062), ch. 161, p. 558, § 8, effective August 11.

30-10-315. Penalty for acting without bond or insurance.

If any county commissioner acts as such officer, performs any of the duties, or exercises any of the rights or privileges of county commissioner without being bonded or insured pursuant to section 30-10-311, or after judgment of removal from such office has been entered, the commissioner commits a class 2 misdemeanor.

Source:

L. 1881:

p. 98, § 5.

G.S.

§ 568.

R.S. 08:

§ 1247.

C.L.

§ 8723.

CSA:

C. 45, § 70.

CRS 53:

§ 35-3-14.

L. 63:

p. 326, § 15.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 35-3-14.

L. 2010:

Entire section amended, (HB 10-1062), ch. 161, p. 558, § 9, effective August 11.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3247, § 499, effective March 1, 2022.

30-10-316. Suits on bond or insurance.

Upon default or breach of any of the conditions of either the bond or the insurance policy required by section 30-10-311 by any county commissioner in this state, either the district attorney for the district in which such commissioner resided at the time of such breach, the county attorney of such county, or any taxpayer of the county who will become responsible for the costs of suit, may institute an action in any court of competent jurisdiction in such county in the name of the board of county commissioners of the county and against the principal and sureties upon the bond or the insurance policy for the damages such county has sustained by reason of the breach of any of the conditions contained in the bond or the insurance policy. When a suit is brought by any person other than the district or county attorney, the court may require surety for costs as in other civil cases.

Source:

L. 1881:

p. 98, § 7.

G.S.

§ 570.

L. 1885:

p. 162, § 1.

R.S. 08:

§ 1249.

C.L.

§ 8725.

CSA:

C. 45, § 72.

CRS 53:

§ 35-3-16.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 35-3-16.

L. 2010:

Entire section amended, (HB 10-1062), ch. 161, p. 558, § 10, effective August 11.

30-10-317. County to recover all damages - execution against body.

In any action filed pursuant to section 30-10-316, the county shall recover all damages, both proximate and remote, that it may have sustained by reason of any breach of the conditions of the bond or the insurance policy required by section 30-10-311, as applicable; and if it appears on the trial of any such case that the breach was tortious, fraudulent, or willful, and that the county shall not be able to recover judgment against the sureties or, having recovered judgment, is unable to collect the same from the principal or the principal's sureties, the county may have execution against the body of such principal, who shall be confined in the county jail of the county until such judgment and costs are paid; except that such imprisonment shall not exceed one year.

Source:

L. 1881:

p. 98, § 8.

G.S.

§ 571.

R.S. 08:

§ 1250.

C.L.

§ 8726.

CSA:

C. 45, § 73.

CRS 53:

§ 35-3-17.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 35-3-17.

L. 2010:

Entire section amended, (HB 10-1062), ch. 161, p. 559, § 11, effective August 11.

30-10-318. Recovery for all damage - liability.

In all suits upon the official bonds or insurance policies required by section 30-10-311, the recovery against a member of the board of county commissioners shall not be limited to a proportionate amount of the damage proved, but the recovery on the bond of each shall be for the whole amount of damage proved. If any member of a board of county commissioners knowingly acquiesces in any misappropriation of the funds of a county, or in the allowance of bills that are not legally allowable, or in the payment thereof, the sureties or insurer of the county commissioner, as applicable, shall be liable for all damages, both proximate and remote, that the county sustains for reason thereof, to be recovered as provided.

Source:

L. 1881:

p. 99, § 9.

G.S.

§ 572.

R.S. 08:

§ 1251.

C.L.

§ 8727.

CSA:

C. 45, § 74.

CRS 53:

§ 35-3-18.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 35-3-18.

L. 2010:

Entire section amended, (HB 10-1062), ch. 161, p. 559, § 12, effective August 11.

30-10-319. Clerk of board - duties.

It is the general duty of the clerk of the board of county commissioners:

To record, in a book to be provided for that purpose, all proceedings of the board;

To make regular entries of all their resolutions and decisions on all questions concerning the raising of money;

To record the vote of each commissioner on any question submitted to the board, if required by any member;

Except when specifically provided otherwise by law, sign all orders issued by the board for the payment of money;

To preserve and file all accounts acted upon by the board, with their action thereon, and he shall perform such other duties as are required by law.

Source:

G.L.

§ 469.

G.S.

§ 554.

R.S. 08:

§ 1252.

C.L.

§ 8728.

CSA:

C. 45, § 75.

CRS 53:

§ 35-3-19.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 35-3-19.

L. 69:

p. 223, § 1.

L. 71:

p. 324, § 1.

Cross references:

For the county clerk being the clerk of the board of county commissioners, see § 30-10-402.

30-10-320. Clerk to designate amount - copies of records.

It is the duty of such clerk to designate upon every account which is audited and allowed by the board the amount so allowed; and he shall also deliver to any person who may demand it a certified copy of any record in his office, or any account on file therein, on receiving from such person the fees prescribed by law.

Source:

G.L.

§ 470.

G.S.

§ 555.

R.S. 08:

§ 1253.

C.L.

§ 8729.

CSA:

C. 45, § 76.

CRS 53:

§ 35-3-20.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 35-3-20.

Cross references:

For fees of county clerk and recorders for copies of records, see § 30-1-103.

30-10-321. Orders - dated and numbered - records of issuance.

Such clerk shall not sign or issue any county order, unless ordered by the board of county commissioners authorizing the same; and every such order shall be numbered, and the date, amount, and number of the same, and the name of the person to whom it is issued, shall be entered in a book kept by him in his office for that purpose.

Source:

G.L.

§ 471.

G.S.

§ 556.

R.S. 08:

§ 1254.

C.L.

§ 8730.

CSA:

C. 45, § 77.

CRS 53:

§ 35-3-21.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 35-3-21.

30-10-322. Penalty for failure to perform duty.

If any commissioner refuses or neglects to perform any of the duties which are required of him by law as a member of the board of county commissioners, without just cause therefor, he shall, for each offense, forfeit a sum not less than twenty-five nor more than one hundred dollars.

Source:

G.L.

§ 468.

G.S.

§ 551.

R.S. 08:

§ 1238.

C.L.

§ 8715.

CSA:

C. 45, § 62.

CRS 53:

§ 35-3-22.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 35-3-22.